Ohio, session 136, HB967.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.2324 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.2324. The third week of January is designated as "Security Technician Week" in honor of the dedication and contributions of security technicians who design, install, maintain, and service electronic security and life safety systems that protect the people and infrastructure of this state.